Illinois, session 104th, SB3472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5A-12.7 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5A-12.7)7    Sec. 5A-12.7. Continuation of hospital access payments on 8and after July 1, 2020.9    (a) To preserve and improve access to hospital services, 10for hospital services rendered on and after July 1, 2020, the 11Department shall, except for hospitals described in subsection 12(b) of Section 5A-3, make payments to hospitals or require 13capitated managed care organizations to make payments as set 14forth in this Section. Payments under this Section are not due 15and payable, however, until: (i) the methodologies described 16in this Section are approved by the federal government in an 17appropriate State Plan amendment or directed payment preprint; 18and (ii) the assessment imposed under this Article is 19determined to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the 20Social Security Act. In determining the hospital access 21payments authorized under subsection (g) of this Section, if a 22hospital ceases to qualify for payments from the pool, the 23payments for all hospitals continuing to qualify for payments   SB3472- 2 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1from such pool shall be uniformly adjusted to fully expend the 2aggregate net amount of the pool, with such adjustment being 3effective on the first day of the second month following the 4date the hospital ceases to receive payments from such pool.5    (b) Amounts moved into claims-based rates and distributed 6in accordance with Section 14-12 shall remain in those 7claims-based rates.8    (c) Graduate medical education.9        (1) The calculation of graduate medical education 10    payments shall be based on the hospital's Medicare cost 11    report ending in Calendar Year 2018, as reported in the 12    Healthcare Cost Report Information System file, release 13    date September 30, 2019. An Illinois hospital reporting 14    intern and resident cost on its Medicare cost report shall 15    be eligible for graduate medical education payments.16        (2) Each hospital's annualized Medicaid Intern 17    Resident Cost is calculated using annualized intern and 18    resident total costs obtained from Worksheet B Part I, 19    Columns 21 and 22 the sum of Lines 30-43, 50-76, 90-93, 20    96-98, and 105-112 multiplied by the percentage that the 21    hospital's Medicaid days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, 22    Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, and 32) comprise of the 23    hospital's total days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 8, 24    Lines 14, 16-18, and 32).25        (3) An annualized Medicaid indirect medical education 26    (IME) payment is calculated for each hospital using its   SB3472- 3 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    IME payments (Worksheet E Part A, Line 29, Column 1) 2    multiplied by the percentage that its Medicaid days 3    (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, 4    and 32) comprise of its Medicare days (Worksheet S3 Part 5    I, Column 6, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, and 16-18).6        (4) For each hospital, its annualized Medicaid Intern 7    Resident Cost and its annualized Medicaid IME payment are 8    summed, and, except as capped at 120% of the average cost 9    per intern and resident for all qualifying hospitals as 10    calculated under this paragraph, is multiplied by the 11    applicable reimbursement factor as described in this 12    paragraph, to determine the hospital's final graduate 13    medical education payment. Each hospital's average cost 14    per intern and resident shall be calculated by summing its 15    total annualized Medicaid Intern Resident Cost plus its 16    annualized Medicaid IME payment and dividing that amount 17    by the hospital's total Full Time Equivalent Residents and 18    Interns. If the hospital's average per intern and resident 19    cost is greater than 120% of the same calculation for all 20    qualifying hospitals, the hospital's per intern and 21    resident cost shall be capped at 120% of the average cost 22    for all qualifying hospitals.23            (A) For the period of July 1, 2020 through 24        December 31, 2022, the applicable reimbursement factor 25        shall be 22.6%. 26            (B) Beginning January 1, 2023, the applicable   SB3472- 4 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        reimbursement factor shall be 35% for all qualified 2        safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 5-5e.1 of 3        this Code, and all hospitals with 100 or more Full Time 4        Equivalent Residents and Interns, as reported on the 5        hospital's Medicare cost report ending in Calendar 6        Year 2018, and for all other qualified hospitals the 7        applicable reimbursement factor shall be 30%. 8    (d) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. For the period 9of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, each Illinois 10hospital shall receive an annual payment equal to the amounts 11below, to be paid in 12 equal installments on or before the 12seventh State business day of each month, except that no 13payment shall be due within 30 days after the later of the date 14of notification of federal approval of the payment 15methodologies required under this Section or any waiver 16required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which time the sum of amounts 17required under this Section prior to the date of notification 18is due and payable.19        (1) For critical access hospitals, $385 per covered 20    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 21    $530 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates 22    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 23    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.24        (2) For safety-net hospitals, $960 per covered 25    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 26    $625 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates   SB3472- 5 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 2    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.3        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $295 per 4    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 5    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 6    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.7        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $125 per 8    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 9    claims and $130 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 10    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 11    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.12        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $355 13    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 14    fee-for-service claims for dates of service in Calendar 15    Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as 16    of May 11, 2020.17        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 18    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $350 per 19    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 20    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 21    $620 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 22    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.23        (7) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 24    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 25    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 26    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional   SB3472- 6 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 2    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 3    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 4    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 5    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 6    of the qualifying hospital's State Fiscal Year 2018 total 7    inpatient fee-for-service days multiplied by the 8    applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $226.30 for 9    hospitals located in Cook County and $116.21 for hospitals 10    located outside Cook County.11    (d-2) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. Beginning 12January 1, 2023, each Illinois hospital shall receive an 13annual payment equal to the amounts listed below, to be paid in 1412 equal installments on or before the seventh State business 15day of each month, except that no payment shall be due within 1630 days after the later of the date of notification of federal 17approval of the payment methodologies required under this 18Section or any waiver required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which 19time the sum of amounts required under this Section prior to 20the date of notification is due and payable. The Department 21may adjust the rates in paragraphs (1) through (7) to comply 22with the federal upper payment limits, with such adjustments 23being determined so that the total estimated spending by 24hospital class, under such adjusted rates, remains 25substantially similar to the total estimated spending under 26the original rates set forth in this subsection.   SB3472- 7 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (1) For critical access hospitals, as defined in 2    subsection (f), $750 per covered inpatient day contained 3    in paid fee-for-service claims and $750 per paid 4    fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates of service in 5    Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data 6    Warehouse as of August 6, 2021.7        (2) For safety-net hospitals, as described in 8    subsection (f), $1,350 per inpatient day contained in paid 9    fee-for-service claims and $1,350 per paid fee-for-service 10    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 11    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 12    August 6, 2021.13        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $550 per 14    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 15    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 16    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 17    2021.18        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $200 per 19    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 20    claims and $200 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 21    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 22    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 23    2021.24        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $550 25    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 26    fee-for-service claims and $125 per paid fee-for-service   SB3472- 8 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 2    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 3    August 6, 2021.4        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 5    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $500 per 6    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 7    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 8    $500 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 9    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 10    2021.11        (7) For public hospitals, as defined in subsection 12    (f), $275 per covered inpatient day contained in paid 13    fee-for-service claims and $275 per paid fee-for-service 14    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 15    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 16    August 6, 2021.17        (8) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 18    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 19    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 20    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional 21    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 22    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 23    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 24    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 25    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 26    of the qualifying hospital's Calendar Year 2019 total   SB3472- 9 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    inpatient fee-for-service days, in the Department's 2    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 2021, multiplied 3    by the applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $244.37 4    for hospitals located in Cook County and $312.03 for 5    hospitals located outside Cook County.6    (d-3) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. Beginning 7January 1, 2027, if an Illinois freestanding psychiatric 8hospital reopens a previously closed hospital facility within 94 calendar years of that hospital facility's closure, and the 10previously closed hospital facility qualified for payments 11under paragraph (d), then the Illinois freestanding 12psychiatric hospital shall receive an annual payment equal to 13$200 per covered inpatient day contained in paid 14fee-for-service claims and $200 per paid fee-for-service 15outpatient claim for dates of service of the closed hospital 16facility in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise 17Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020. As used in this subsection, 18"closed hospital facility" includes hospitals that have been 19terminated from participation in the medical assistance 20program in accordance with Section 12-4.25 of this Code. 21    (e) The Department shall require managed care 22organizations (MCOs) to make directed payments and 23pass-through payments according to this Section. Each calendar 24year, the Department shall require MCOs to pay the maximum 25amount out of these funds as allowed as pass-through payments 26under federal regulations. The Department shall require MCOs   SB3472- 10 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1to make such pass-through payments as specified in this 2Section. The Department shall require the MCOs to pay the 3remaining amounts as directed Payments as specified in this 4Section. The Department shall issue payments to the 5Comptroller by the seventh business day of each month for all 6MCOs that are sufficient for MCOs to make the directed 7payments and pass-through payments according to this Section. 8The Department shall require the MCOs to make pass-through 9payments and directed payments using electronic funds 10transfers (EFT), if the hospital provides the information 11necessary to process such EFTs, in accordance with directions 12provided monthly by the Department, within 7 business days of 13the date the funds are paid to the MCOs, as indicated by the 14"Paid Date" on the website of the Office of the Comptroller if 15the funds are paid by EFT and the MCOs have received directed 16payment instructions. If funds are not paid through the 17Comptroller by EFT, payment must be made within 7 business 18days of the date actually received by the MCO. The MCO will be 19considered to have paid the pass-through payments when the 20payment remittance number is generated or the date the MCO 21sends the check to the hospital, if EFT information is not 22supplied. If an MCO is late in paying a pass-through payment or 23directed payment as required under this Section (including any 24extensions granted by the Department), it shall pay a penalty, 25unless waived by the Department for reasonable cause, to the 26Department equal to 5% of the amount of the pass-through   SB3472- 11 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1payment or directed payment not paid on or before the due date 2plus 5% of the portion thereof remaining unpaid on the last day 3of each 30-day period thereafter. Payments to MCOs that would 4be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment 5in the absence of the increased capitation payments under this 6Section shall not be reduced as a consequence of payments made 7under this subsection. The Department shall publish and 8maintain on its website for a period of no less than 8 calendar 9quarters, the quarterly calculation of directed payments and 10pass-through payments owed to each hospital from each MCO. All 11calculations and reports shall be posted no later than the 12first day of the quarter for which the payments are to be 13issued.14    (f)(1) For purposes of allocating the funds included in 15capitation payments to MCOs, Illinois hospitals shall be 16divided into the following classes as defined in 17administrative rules:18        (A) Beginning July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, 19    critical access hospitals. Beginning January 1, 2023, 20    "critical access hospital" means a hospital designated by 21    the Department of Public Health as a critical access 22    hospital, excluding any hospital meeting the definition of 23    a public hospital in subparagraph (F). 24        (B) Safety-net hospitals, except that stand-alone 25    children's hospitals that are not specialty children's 26    hospitals, safety-net hospitals that elect not to be   SB3472- 12 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    included as provided in item (i), and, for calendar years 2    2025 and 2026 only, hospitals with over 9,000 Medicaid 3    acute care inpatient admissions per calendar year, 4    excluding admissions for Medicare-Medicaid dual eligible 5    patients, will not be included. For the calendar year 6    beginning January 1, 2023, and each calendar year 7    thereafter, assignment to the safety-net class shall be 8    based on the annual safety-net rate year beginning 15 9    months before the beginning of the first Payout Quarter of 10    the calendar year. 11            (i) Beginning calendar year 2026, all hospitals 12        qualifying as a safety-net hospital under subsection 13        (a) of Section 5-5e.1 for rates years beginning on and 14        after October 1, 2024 shall be permitted to elect to 15        remain in the high Medicaid hospital class as defined 16        in subparagraph (G) for purposes of the State directed 17        payments described in subsection (r) instead of being 18        assigned to the safety-net fixed pool directed 19        payments class as described in subsection (g).20            (ii) If a hospital elects assignment in the high 21        Medicaid hospital class as defined in subparagraph 22        (G), the hospital must remain in the high Medicaid 23        hospital class for the entire calendar year. 24        (C) Long term acute care hospitals.25        (D) Freestanding psychiatric hospitals.26        (E) Freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.  SB3472- 13 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (F) Beginning January 1, 2023, "public hospital" means 2    a hospital that is owned or operated by an Illinois 3    Government body or municipality, excluding a hospital 4    provider that is a State agency, a State university, or a 5    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more. 6        (G) High Medicaid hospitals. 7            (i) As used in this Section, "high Medicaid 8        hospital" means a general acute care hospital that:9                (I) For the payout periods July 1, 2020 10            through December 31, 2022, is not a safety-net 11            hospital or critical access hospital and that has 12            a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate above 30% or 13            a hospital that had over 35,000 inpatient Medicaid 14            days during the applicable period. For the period 15            July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, the 16            applicable period for the Medicaid Inpatient 17            Utilization Rate (MIUR) is the rate year 2020 MIUR 18            and for the number of inpatient days it is State 19            fiscal year 2018. Beginning in calendar year 2021, 20            the Department shall use the most recently 21            determined MIUR, as defined in subsection (h) of 22            Section 5-5.02, and for the inpatient day 23            threshold, the State fiscal year ending 18 months 24            prior to the beginning of the calendar year. For 25            purposes of calculating MIUR under this Section, 26            children's hospitals and affiliated general acute   SB3472- 14 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1            care hospitals shall be considered a single 2            hospital.3                (II) For the calendar year beginning January 4            1, 2023, and each calendar year thereafter, is not 5            a public hospital, safety-net hospital, or 6            critical access hospital and that qualifies as a 7            regional high volume hospital or is a hospital 8            that has a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 9            (MIUR) above 30%. As used in this item, "regional 10            high volume hospital" means a hospital which ranks 11            in the top 2 quartiles based on total hospital 12            services volume, of all eligible general acute 13            care hospitals, when ranked in descending order 14            based on total hospital services volume, within 15            the same Medicaid managed care region, as 16            designated by the Department, as of January 1, 17            2022. As used in this item, "total hospital 18            services volume" means the total of all Medical 19            Assistance hospital inpatient admissions plus all 20            Medical Assistance hospital outpatient visits. For 21            purposes of determining regional high volume 22            hospital inpatient admissions and outpatient 23            visits, the Department shall use dates of service 24            provided during State Fiscal Year 2020 for the 25            Payout Quarter beginning January 1, 2023. The 26            Department shall use dates of service from the   SB3472- 15 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1            State fiscal year ending 18 month before the 2            beginning of the first Payout Quarter of the 3            subsequent annual determination period. 4            (ii) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 5        2023, the Department shall use the Rate Year 2022 6        Medicaid inpatient utilization rate (MIUR), as defined 7        in subsection (h) of Section 5-5.02. For each 8        subsequent annual determination, the Department shall 9        use the MIUR applicable to the rate year ending 10        September 30 of the year preceding the beginning of 11        the calendar year. 12        (H) General acute care hospitals. As used under this 13    Section, "general acute care hospitals" means all other 14    Illinois hospitals not identified in subparagraphs (A) 15    through (G).16    (2) Hospitals' qualification for each class shall be 17assessed prior to the beginning of each calendar year and the 18new class designation shall be effective January 1 of the next 19year. The Department shall publish by rule the process for 20establishing class determination.21    (3) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department may reassign 22hospitals or entire hospital classes as defined above, if 23federal limits on the payments to the class to which the 24hospitals are assigned based on the criteria in this 25subsection prevent the Department from making payments to the 26class that would otherwise be due under this Section. The   SB3472- 16 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1Department shall publish the criteria and composition of each 2new class based on the reassignments, and the projected impact 3on payments to each hospital under the new classes on its 4website by November 15 of the year before the year in which the 5class changes become effective. 6    (g) Fixed pool directed payments. Beginning July 1, 2020, 7the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 8used to issue directed payments to qualified Illinois 9safety-net hospitals and critical access hospitals on a 10monthly basis in accordance with this subsection. Prior to the 11beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 12Department shall use encounter claims data from the 13Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 14Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 15services rendered by safety-net hospitals and critical access 16hospitals to determine a quarterly uniform per unit add-on for 17each hospital class.18        (1) Inpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform per 19    diem add-on shall be derived by dividing the quarterly 20    Inpatient Directed Payments Pool amount allocated to the 21    applicable hospital class by the total inpatient days 22    contained on all encounter claims received during the 23    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.24            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 25        quarterly inpatient directed payment calculated that 26        is equal to the product of the number of inpatient days   SB3472- 17 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        attributable to the hospital used in the calculation 2        of the quarterly uniform class per diem add-on, 3        multiplied by the calculated applicable quarterly 4        uniform class per diem add-on of the hospital class.5            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 6        quarterly inpatient directed payment in each of the 3 7        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 8        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.9        (2) Outpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform 10    per claim add-on shall be derived by dividing the 11    quarterly Outpatient Directed Payments Pool amount 12    allocated to the applicable hospital class by the total 13    outpatient encounter claims received during the 14    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.15            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 16        quarterly outpatient directed payment calculated that 17        is equal to the product of the number of outpatient 18        encounter claims attributable to the hospital used in 19        the calculation of the quarterly uniform class per 20        claim add-on, multiplied by the calculated applicable 21        quarterly uniform class per claim add-on of the 22        hospital class.23            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 24        quarterly outpatient directed payment in each of the 3 25        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 26        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.  SB3472- 18 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (3) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 2    Directed Payment as identified by the Department on its 3    quarterly determination report.4        (4) Definitions. As used in this subsection:5            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each 3 month calendar 6        quarter, beginning July 1, 2020.7            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each 3 month 8        calendar quarter, which ends 3 months prior to the 9        first day of each Payout Quarter.10        (5) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, 11    the following amounts shall be allocated to the following 12    hospital class directed payment pools for the quarterly 13    development of a uniform per unit add-on:14            (A) $2,894,500 for hospital inpatient services for 15        critical access hospitals.16            (B) $4,294,374 for hospital outpatient services 17        for critical access hospitals.18            (C) $29,109,330 for hospital inpatient services 19        for safety-net hospitals.20            (D) $35,041,218 for hospital outpatient services 21        for safety-net hospitals.22        (6) For the period January 1, 2023 through December 23    31, 2023, the Department shall establish the amounts that 24    shall be allocated to the hospital class directed payment 25    fixed pools identified in this paragraph for the quarterly 26    development of a uniform per unit add-on. The Department   SB3472- 19 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    shall establish such amounts so that the total amount of 2    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 3    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 4    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 5    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 6    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 7    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 8    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 9    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 10    payment fixed pool amounts to be established under this 11    paragraph on its website by November 15, 2022. 12            (A) Hospital inpatient services for critical 13        access hospitals.14            (B) Hospital outpatient services for critical 15        access hospitals.16            (C) Hospital inpatient services for public 17        hospitals.18            (D) Hospital outpatient services for public 19        hospitals.20            (E) Hospital inpatient services for safety-net 21        hospitals.22            (F) Hospital outpatient services for safety-net 23        hospitals.24        (7) Semi-annual rate maintenance review. The 25    Department shall ensure that hospitals assigned to the 26    fixed pools in paragraph (6) are paid no less than 95% of   SB3472- 20 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    the annual initial rate for each 6-month period of each 2    annual payout period. For each calendar year, the 3    Department shall calculate the annual initial rate per day 4    and per visit for each fixed pool hospital class listed in 5    paragraph (6), by dividing the total of all applicable 6    inpatient or outpatient directed payments issued in the 7    preceding calendar year to the hospitals in each fixed 8    pool class for the calendar year, plus any increase 9    resulting from the annual adjustments described in 10    subsection (i), by the actual applicable total service 11    units for the preceding calendar year which were the basis 12    of the total applicable inpatient or outpatient directed 13    payments issued to the hospitals in each fixed pool class 14    in the calendar year, except that for calendar year 2023, 15    the service units from calendar year 2021 shall be used. 16            (A) The Department shall calculate the effective 17        rate, per day and per visit, for the payout periods of 18        January to June and July to December of each year, for 19        each fixed pool listed in paragraph (6), by dividing 20        50% of the annual pool by the total applicable 21        reported service units for the 2 applicable 22        determination quarters.23            (B) If the effective rate calculated in 24        subparagraph (A) is less than 95% of the annual 25        initial rate assigned to the class for each pool under 26        paragraph (6), the Department shall adjust the payment   SB3472- 21 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        for each hospital to a level equal to no less than 95% 2        of the annual initial rate, by issuing a retroactive 3        adjustment payment for the 6-month period under review 4        as identified in subparagraph (A). 5    (h) Fixed rate directed payments. Effective July 1, 2020, 6the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 7used to issue directed payments to Illinois hospitals not 8identified in paragraph (g) on a monthly basis. Prior to the 9beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 10Department shall use encounter claims data from the 11Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 12Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 13services rendered by hospitals in each hospital class 14identified in paragraph (f) and not identified in paragraph 15(g). For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, the 16Department shall direct MCOs to make payments as follows:17        (1) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 18    to $1,750 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 19    20 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 20    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 21    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.22        (2) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 23    to $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 24    21 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 25    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 26    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.  SB3472- 22 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (3) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 2    to $80 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 3    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 4    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 5    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.6        (4) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 7    to $375 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 8    24 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 9    by the hospital's total number of category of service 24 10    paid EAPG (EAPGs) for the determination quarter.11        (5) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 12    to $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 13    27 and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 14    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 15    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 16    quarter.17        (6) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 18    to $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 19    29 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 20    by the hospital's total number of category of service 29 21    paid EAPGs for the determination quarter.22        (7) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 23    $1,800 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 20 24    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 25    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 26    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.  SB3472- 23 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (8) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 2    $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 21 3    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 4    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 5    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.6        (9) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to $80 7    multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 case 8    mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by the 9    hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 10    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.11        (10) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 12    $400 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 24 13    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 14    the hospital's total number of category of service 24 paid 15    EAPG outpatient claims for the determination quarter.16        (11) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 17    $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 27 18    and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 19    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 20    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 21    quarter.22        (12) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 23    $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 29 24    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 25    the hospital's total number of category of service 29 paid 26    EAPGs for the determination quarter.  SB3472- 24 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (13) For long term acute care hospitals the amount of 2    $495 multiplied by the hospital's total number of 3    inpatient days for the determination quarter.4        (14) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $210 5    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 6    days for category of service 21 for the determination 7    quarter.8        (15) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $250 9    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 10    claims for category of service 27 and 28 for the 11    determination quarter.12        (16) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $410 13    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 14    days for category of service 22 for the determination 15    quarter.16        (17) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $100 17    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 18    claims for category of service 29 for the determination 19    quarter.20        (18) Effective for the Payout Quarter beginning 21    January 1, 2023, for the directed payments to hospitals 22    required under this subsection, the Department shall 23    establish the amounts that shall be used to calculate such 24    directed payments using the methodologies specified in 25    this paragraph. The Department shall use a single, uniform 26    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1)   SB3472- 25 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    through (12), for all categories of inpatient services 2    provided by each class of hospitals and a single uniform 3    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 4    through (12), for all categories of outpatient services 5    provided by each class of hospitals. The Department shall 6    establish such amounts so that the total amount of 7    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 8    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 9    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 10    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 11    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 12    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 13    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 14    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 15    payment amounts to be established under this subsection on 16    its website by November 15, 2022. 17        (19) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of their 18    quarterly inpatient and outpatient directed payment in 19    each of the 3 months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance 20    with directions provided to each MCO by the Department.21        (20) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 22    Directed Payment amount as identified by the Department on 23    its quarterly determination report.24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if 25the Department determines that the actual total hospital 26utilization data that is used to calculate the fixed rate   SB3472- 26 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1directed payments is substantially different than anticipated 2when the rates in this subsection were initially determined 3for unforeseeable circumstances (such as the COVID-19 pandemic 4or some other public health emergency), the Department may 5adjust the rates specified in this subsection so that the 6total directed payments approximate the total spending amount 7anticipated when the rates were initially established. 8    Definitions. As used in this subsection:9            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each calendar quarter, 10        beginning July 1, 2020.11            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each calendar 12        quarter which ends 3 months prior to the first day of 13        each Payout Quarter.14            (C) "Case mix index" means a hospital specific 15        calculation. For inpatient claims the case mix index 16        is calculated each quarter by summing the relative 17        weight of all inpatient Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) 18        claims for a category of service in the applicable 19        Determination Quarter and dividing the sum by the 20        number of sum total of all inpatient DRG admissions 21        for the category of service for the associated claims. 22        The case mix index for outpatient claims is calculated 23        each quarter by summing the relative weight of all 24        paid EAPGs in the applicable Determination Quarter and 25        dividing the sum by the sum total of paid EAPGs for the 26        associated claims.  SB3472- 27 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    (i) Beginning January 1, 2021, the rates for directed 2payments shall be recalculated in order to spend the 3additional funds for directed payments that result from 4reduction in the amount of pass-through payments allowed under 5federal regulations. The additional funds for directed 6payments shall be allocated proportionally to each class of 7hospitals based on that class' proportion of services.8        (1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed pool directed 9    payment amounts and the associated annual initial rates 10    referenced in paragraph (6) of subsection (f) for each 11    hospital class shall be uniformly increased by a ratio of 12    not less than, the ratio of the total pass-through 13    reduction amount pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection 14    (j), for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool 15    directed payment class for the next calendar year, to the 16    total inpatient and outpatient directed payments for the 17    hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool directed 18    payment class paid during the preceding calendar year. 19        (2) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed rates for the 20    directed payments referenced in paragraph (18) of 21    subsection (h) for each hospital class shall be uniformly 22    increased by a ratio of not less than, the ratio of the 23    total pass-through reduction amount pursuant to paragraph 24    (4) of subsection (j), for the hospitals comprising the 25    hospital directed payment class for the next calendar 26    year, to the total inpatient and outpatient directed   SB3472- 28 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    payments for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed 2    rate directed payment class paid during the preceding 3    calendar year. 4    (j) Pass-through payments.5        (1) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 31, 6    2020, the Department shall assign quarterly pass-through 7    payments to each class of hospitals equal to one-fourth of 8    the following annual allocations:9            (A) $390,487,095 to safety-net hospitals.10            (B) $62,553,886 to critical access hospitals.11            (C) $345,021,438 to high Medicaid hospitals.12            (D) $551,429,071 to general acute care hospitals.13            (E) $27,283,870 to long term acute care hospitals.14            (F) $40,825,444 to freestanding psychiatric 15        hospitals.16            (G) $9,652,108 to freestanding rehabilitation 17        hospitals.18        (2) For the period of July 1, 2020 through December 19    31, 2020, the pass-through payments shall at a minimum 20    ensure hospitals receive a total amount of monthly 21    payments under this Section as received in calendar year 22    2019 in accordance with this Article and paragraph (1) of 23    subsection (d-5) of Section 14-12, exclusive of amounts 24    received through payments referenced in subsection (b).25        (3) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, 26    the Department shall establish the annual pass-through   SB3472- 29 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    allocation to each class of hospitals and the pass-through 2    payments to each hospital so that the total amount of 3    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 4    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 5    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 6    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 7    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 8    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 9    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 10    constant. The Department shall publish the pass-through 11    allocation to each class and the pass-through payments to 12    each hospital to be established under this subsection on 13    its website by November 15, 2022. 14        (4) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2021 15    and January 1, 2022, each hospital's pass-through payment 16    amount shall be reduced proportionally to the reduction of 17    all pass-through payments required by federal regulations. 18    Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department shall reduce 19    total pass-through payments by the minimum amount 20    necessary to comply with federal regulations. Pass-through 21    payments to safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 22    5-5e.1 of this Code, shall not be reduced until all 23    pass-through payments to other hospitals have been 24    eliminated. All other hospitals shall have their 25    pass-through payments reduced proportionally. 26    (k) At least 30 days prior to each calendar year, the   SB3472- 30 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1Department shall notify each hospital of changes to the 2payment methodologies in this Section, including, but not 3limited to, changes in the fixed rate directed payment rates, 4the aggregate pass-through payment amount for all hospitals, 5and the hospital's pass-through payment amount for the 6upcoming calendar year.7    (l) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 8the Department may adopt rules to change the methodology for 9directed and pass-through payments as set forth in this 10Section, but only to the extent necessary to obtain federal 11approval of a necessary State Plan amendment or Directed 12Payment Preprint or to otherwise conform to federal law or 13federal regulation.14    (m) As used in this subsection, "managed care 15organization" or "MCO" means an entity which contracts with 16the Department to provide services where payment for medical 17services is made on a capitated basis, excluding contracted 18entities for dual eligible or Department of Children and 19Family Services youth populations.20    (n) In order to address the escalating infant mortality 21rates among minority communities in Illinois, the State shall, 22subject to appropriation, create a pool of funding of at least 23$50,000,000 annually to be disbursed among safety-net 24hospitals that maintain perinatal designation from the 25Department of Public Health. The funding shall be used to 26preserve or enhance OB/GYN services or other specialty   SB3472- 31 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1services at the receiving hospital, with the distribution of 2funding to be established by rule and with consideration to 3perinatal hospitals with safe birthing levels and quality 4metrics for healthy mothers and babies.5    (o) In order to address the growing challenges of 6providing stable access to healthcare in rural Illinois, 7including perinatal services, behavioral healthcare including 8substance use disorder services (SUDs) and other specialty 9services, and to expand access to telehealth services among 10rural communities in Illinois, the Department of Healthcare 11and Family Services shall administer a program to provide at 12least $10,000,000 in financial support annually to critical 13access hospitals for delivery of perinatal and OB/GYN 14services, behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other 15specialty services and telehealth services. The funding shall 16be used to preserve or enhance perinatal and OB/GYN services, 17behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other specialty 18services, as well as the explanation of telehealth services by 19the receiving hospital, with the distribution of funding to be 20established by rule. 21    (p) For calendar year 2023, the final amounts, rates, and 22payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), (h), and (j) shall 23be established by the Department, so that the sum of the total 24estimated annual payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), 25(h), and (j) for each hospital class for calendar year 2023, is 26no less than:   SB3472- 32 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1        (1) $858,260,000 to safety-net hospitals.2        (2) $86,200,000 to critical access hospitals.3        (3) $1,765,000,000 to high Medicaid hospitals.4        (4) $673,860,000 to general acute care hospitals.5        (5) $48,330,000 to long term acute care hospitals.6        (6) $89,110,000 to freestanding psychiatric hospitals.7        (7) $24,300,000 to freestanding rehabilitation 8    hospitals.9        (8) $32,570,000 to public hospitals.10    (q) Hospital Pandemic Recovery Stabilization Payments. The 11Department shall disburse a pool of $460,000,000 in stability 12payments to hospitals prior to April 1, 2023. The allocation 13of the pool shall be based on the hospital directed payment 14classes and directed payments issued, during Calendar Year 152022 with added consideration to safety net hospitals, as 16defined in subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this Section, and critical 17access hospitals. 18    (r) Directed payment update. For calendar year 2025, and 19each calendar year thereafter, the final amounts, rates, and 20payments for the fixed pool directed payments described in 21subsection (g) and the fixed rate directed payments described 22in subsection (h) shall be established by the Department at no 23less than the following:24        (1) $579,261,585 for inpatient services at safety-net 25    hospitals.26        (2) $763,418,138 for outpatient services at safety-net   SB3472- 33 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    hospitals.2        (3) $12,389,160 for inpatient services at critical 3    access hospitals.4        (4) $137,437,866 for outpatient services at critical 5    access hospitals.6        (5) $5,418 as a base fixed rate per admit prior to 7    adjusting for acuity, for inpatient services at high 8    Medicaid hospitals.9        (6) $1,512 as a base fixed rate per paid E-APG prior to 10    adjusting for acuity, for outpatient services at high 11    Medicaid hospitals.12        (7) $3,898 as a base fixed rate per admit prior to 13    adjusting for acuity, for inpatient services at other 14    acute care hospitals.15        (8) $1,322 as a base fixed rate per E-APG prior to 16    adjusting for acuity, for outpatient services at other 17    acute hospitals.18        (9) $773 per day for inpatient services at long term 19    acute care hospitals.20        (10) $206 per day for inpatient services at 21    freestanding psychiatric hospitals.22        (11) $223 per claim for outpatient services at 23    freestanding psychiatric hospitals.24        (12) $776 per day for inpatient services at 25    freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.26        (13) $252 per claim for outpatient services at   SB3472- 34 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1    freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.2        (14) $7,793,812 for inpatient services at public 3    hospitals.4        (15) $26,849,592 for outpatient services at public 5    hospitals.6    Implementation of the rate increases described in this 7subsection (r) shall be contingent on federal approval. The 8rates for fixed pool directed payments as described in 9subsection (g) and for fixed rate directed payments as 10described in subsection (h) shall remain as published by the 11Department on November 27, 2024 until the Department receives 12federal approval for the updated rates described in this 13subsection (r). 14    (s) If, in order to secure approval by the Centers for 15Medicare and Medicaid Services, the rates under subsection (r) 16are reduced, the Department may submit a State Plan amendment 17to increase rates in place at the time of the reduction 18pertaining to subsection (d-2) to offset the annual amount of 19reduction to the rates under subsection (r), in amounts equal 20to the required reduction on a class-specific basis to ensure 21that funds are not reallocated from one class to another; or 22the rates in subsection (r) shall be reduced uniformly to the 23amounts necessary to achieve approval and the assessments 24imposed by subsection (a) or (b-5) of Section 5A-2 shall be 25reduced uniformly to achieve a total annual reduction across 26both assessments equal to the product of the total annual   SB3472- 35 -LRB104 20562 KTG 34041 b1reduction to payments and .3853. In addition, the assessments 2shall further be reduced uniformly to achieve a total annual 3reduction across both assessments equal to the difference of 4subtracting the product calculated in the previous sentence 5from the resulting quotient of dividing the product described 6in the previous sentence by .92 for a reduction to the 7transfers in subsection 7.16 and 7.17 of Section 5A-8.8    (t) To provide for the expeditious and timely 9implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 11may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 12Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 13emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 14interest, safety, and welfare. 15(Source: P.A. 103-102, eff. 6-16-23; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 16103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 104-7, eff. 6-16-25.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.